dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="چھ/یننا__vblex_caus1">
      <e><p>          <l>نانا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نانے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ناتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نایا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="چھیننا"><i>چھ</i><par n="چھ/یننا__vblex_caus1"/></e>
